Massachusetts, session 194th, H3818.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting after the term “Distinguished Flying Cross” in lines 505, 511, 513,
and 539, the following words:- Air Medal
of 1